Hawaii, session 2026, GM1148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
SECTION 1. Chapter 587A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§587A- Aggravated circumstances. (a) At the return
hearing conducted pursuant to section 587A-28, the court shall
determine whether aggravated circumstances are present.
(1) If aggravated circumstances are present, the court
shall:
(A) Conduct a permanency hearing within thirty days,
and the department shall not be required to
provide the child's parents with an interim
service plan or^Jjite£im yls itatdon2 and
JAL Order the department to file, within sixty days
after the court's finding that aggravated
circumstances are present, a motion to terminate
parental rights unless the department has
2026-1962 HB2096 SDl SMA.docx

Page 2 H.B. NO 2096
H.D. 2
S.D, 1
documented in the safe family home factors or
other written report submitted to the court a
compelling reason why it is not in the best
interest of the child to file a motion; or
(2) If aggravated circumstances are not present or there
is a compelling reason why it is not in the best
interest of the child to file a motion to terminate
parental rights, the court shall order that the
department make reasonable efforts to reunify the
child with the child's parents and order an
appropriate service plan.
(b) Regardless of whether the court finds that aggravated
circumstances are present during the return hearing, at any
other time during the case before the termination of parental
rights, the court may, on its own motion or upon the motion of
any party, order an evidentiary hearing to determine whether
aggravated circumstances are present. If the court finds that
aggravated circumstances are present under this subsection, then
all applicable portions of subsection (a) shall apply.
2026-1962 HB2096 SDl SMA.docx
MimiingiiiiHiimiiiii

Page 3
H.B. NO.
(c) The court may consolidate an aggravated circumstances
hearing with a termination of parental rights hearing pursuant
to section 587A-33 at any time during the case.
(d) Any party shall inform the court within a reasonable
S time upon receipt of evidence of aggravated circumstances."
SECTION 2. Section 587A-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the definition of "aggravated circumstances"
to read as follows:
""Aggravated circumstances" means that:
(1) The parent has murdered, or has solicited, aided,
abetted, attempted, or conspired to commit the murder
or voluntary manslaughter of, another child of the
parent;
(2) The parent has committed a felony assault that results
in serious bodily injury to the child or another child
of the parent;
(3) The parent's rights regarding a sibling of the child
have been judicially terminated or divested;
(4) The family court, or another court of competent
jurisdiction, has found that the parent has tortured
the chi Id [•^] , as described in the offense of torture
2026-1962 HB2096 SDl SMA.docx 3
wniiiimiMiiiiiHi

Page 4 2096
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
tinder section 707-718; provided that a conviction for
that offense shall not be required for a court to make
a finding under this paragraph;
(5) The child is an abandoned infant;
(6) The parent has committed sexual abuse against another
child of the parent; or
(7) The parent is required to register with a sex offender
registry under [s-eet-ioia- 13r3 (-a)—ef—the Adam Wals-h €hi-ld
Protoct-ioR-Q-fid-Safety Act-of 2Q06, ] title [43-] 34
United States Code section [-16913-(a)'. ] 20913. "
SECTION 3. Section 587A-28, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows:
"(e) If the court finds that the child's physical or
psychological health or welfare has been harmed or is subject to
threatened harm by the acts or omissions of the child's family,
the court:
(1) Shall enter a finding that the court has jurisdiction
pursuant to section 587A-5;
(2) Shall enter a finding regarding whether, before the
child was placed in foster care, the department made
2026-1962 HB2096 SDl SMA.docx
luiiinnMMiiiitniBiinoiii

Page 5
H.B. NO. ""
reasonable efforts to prevent or eliminate the need to
remove the child from the child's family home;
(3) Shall enter orders:
(A) That the child be placed in foster custody if the
court finds that the child’s remaining in the
family home is contrary to the welfare of the
child and the child's parents are not willing and
able to provide a safe family home for the child,
even with the assistance of a service plan; or
(B) That the child be placed in family supervision if
the court finds that the child's parents are
willing and able to provide the child with a safe
family home with the assistance of a service
plan;
IS (4) Shall [determine whether aggravated ciireumotaneoo-arc
preoont—
a^5e—preseftt-T—the
court ohal-1;
-Hr)- Conduct a pcr-maneney Clearing -within thirty
day&7—and the- department shall not bo
■required to provide the -child' o -parents with
2026-1962 HB2096 SDl SMA.docx 5

Pages
H.B. NO.
an interim service plan or interim
vie-ttafeieft-;—aad
-(■i±4- Orde-r t-ho -dopar-tment- to file?—within- sixty
doyo-Q-ftor the courtfinding that
aggr-avated circumstances arc present;—a
mafe-ien—fea-^feerwinate-^aiaafcai—uftia&a
the—depaafement-has—daeamented—ia-^the—safa
family homo factors or other written report
submitted to the court a compelling reason
why-at—ia-aat—in—the—hast—dateaeat-af-^feha
child to file a motion.
4-84- If aggravated circumstances arc not present or
there io a—eampaiidag—roasan-why—i-fe—is—aafc—ia—the
heat—dateaaat—ad—the—ehddd-^ta—tide—a—fftatdaa-ta
terminate -parentai- righto?—the court—s halloo rd er
that-the department make reasonable effor-to to
reunify the ehidd-with ■the child’s parents and
order an appropriate ocrvico plan;] make a
determination of aggravated circumstances
pursuant to section 587A- ;
2026-1962 HB2096 SDl SMA.docx 6
iiniiiiiMiinHiiBMii

Page 7 2096
H.B. NO
H.D.2
S.D. 1
(5) Shall order reasonable supervised or unsupervised
visits for the child and the child's family, including
with the child's siblings, unless such visits are
determined to be unsafe or detrimental to, and not in
the best interests of, the child;
(6) Shall order each of the child's birth parents to
complete the medical information forms and release the
medical information required under section 578-14.5,
to the department. If the child's birth parents
refuse to complete the forms or to release the
information, the court may order the release of the
information over the parents' objections;
(7) Shall determine whether each party understands that
unless the family is willing and able to provide the
child with a safe family home, even with the
assistance of a service plan, within the reasonable
period of time specified in the service plan, their
respective parental and custodial duties and rights
shall be subject to termination;
(8) Shall determine the child's date of entry into foster
care as defined in this chapter;
2026-1962 HB2096 SDl SMA.docx 7
HliMIOIIIIIXIilliWIi

Page 8
H.B. NO.
(9) Shall set a periodic review hearing to be conducted no
later than six months after the date of entry into
foster care and a permanency hearing to be held no
later than twelve months after the date of entry into
foster care;
(10) Shall set a status conference, as the court deems
appropriate, to be conducted no later than ninety days
after the return hearing; and
(11) May order that:
(A) Any party participate in, complete, be liable
for, and make every good faith effort to arrange
payment for such services or treatment as are
authorized by law and that are determined to be
in the child's best interests;
(B) The child be examined by a physician, surgeon,
psychiatrist, or psychologist; and
(C) The child receive treatment, including
hospitalization or placement in other suitable
facilities, as is determined to be in the child's
best interests."
2026-1962 HB2096 SDl SMA.docx 8
IKMIIIOMIHIIMMINM

Page 9
H.B. NO.
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-1962 HB2096 SDl SMA.docx 9
lilllBVininHIUlilHIB

2096
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
APPROVED this 27th day of May , 2026
GOVE OR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2096, HD 2, SD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 23, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2096, H.D. 2, S.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: April 14, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
3750